Hawaii statutes.
§181-8 Appeal. Any operator aggrieved
by any decision, order, or action of the board of land and natural resources
refusing, modifying, suspending, canceling, or revoking a permit or
disapproving an amended plan of reclamation may appeal from such decision,
order, or action to the circuit environmental court of the circuit in which is
located any part of the land described in the permit. The appeal shall be
governed by the provisions of rule 72 of the Hawaii rules of civil procedure
and chapter 91. The appellant shall file a bond with the clerk of the circuit
environmental court to which the appeal is taken, in such amount and with such
surety or sureties as the clerk may fix and prescribe, conditioned to pay all
costs if the appeal be decided adversely to the appellant. On motion of the
board the environmental court may require the penalty of the bond to be
increased to such amount and to be so conditioned that the operator filing the
appeal shall be bound to perform all requirements of this chapter. The
environmental court shall have the power to reverse, affirm, or modify in whole
or part, the decision, order, or action appealed from. [L 1957, c 161, §9; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1965, c 96, §80; Supp, §98C-9;
HRS §181-8; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next